Indiana, session 2026, SB286.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-41.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 41.1. ICC Advisory Committee
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Advisory committee" means the ICC advisory committee
established by section 2 of this chapter.
(2) "ICC" means the Indiana cannabis commission
established by IC 7.1-9-2-1.
Sec. 2. The ICC advisory committee is established to serve the
general assembly as a continuing committee. Except as otherwise
provided by this chapter, the advisory committee shall operate
under the rules of the legislative council.
Sec. 3. (a) The advisory committee consists of the following four
(4) voting members and eight (8) nonvoting members:
(1) One (1) legislative member, appointed as a voting member
by the speaker.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(2) One (1) legislative member, appointed as a voting member
by the minority leader of the house of representatives.
(3) One (1) legislative member, appointed as a voting member
by the president pro tempore.
(4) One (1) legislative member, appointed as a voting member
by the minority leader of the senate.
(5) One (1) representative of law enforcement, appointed as a
nonvoting member by the speaker.
(6) One (1) individual having experience in the treatment of
medical conditions by means of cannabis as a patient,
physician, or caregiver, appointed as a nonvoting member by
the president pro tempore.
(7) The commissioner of the department of state revenue or
the commissioner's designee, who serves as a nonvoting
member.
(8) The director of the Indiana state department of
agriculture or the director's designee, who serves as a
nonvoting member.
(9) The state health commissioner or the commissioner's
designee, who serves as a nonvoting member.
(10) A representative of an Indiana based cannabis trade
organization, appointed by the speaker as a nonvoting
member.
(11) A representative of an experienced manufacturer of low
THC hemp extract, appointed by the president pro tempore
as a nonvoting member.
(12) An experienced hemp grower, appointed by the state seed
commissioner as a nonvoting member.
(b) The chairperson of the legislative council shall annually
select one (1) of the voting members to serve as chairperson of the
advisory committee. Whenever there is a new chairperson of the
legislative council, that chairperson may select a new voting
member to serve as chairperson of the advisory committee. The
chairperson of the advisory committee serves at the pleasure of the
chairperson of the legislative council.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the term
of a member of the advisory committee ends on June 30 of the next
odd-numbered year following the member's appointment.
However, the member may be reappointed to subsequent terms.
(b) A member of the advisory committee may be removed at any
time by the appointing authority who appointed the member.
(c) If a vacancy exists on the advisory committee, the appointing
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


authority who appointed the former member whose position has
become vacant shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy. An
individual appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the remainder of
the term of the former member.
(d) If a member of the advisory committee ceases to:
(1) be a member of the chamber from which the member was
appointed; or
(2) hold the member's office;
the member ceases to be a member of the advisory committee.
Sec. 5. Each member of the advisory committee is entitled to
receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to
individuals who serve as legislative and lay members, respectively,
of interim study committees established by the legislative council.
Sec. 6. (a) The advisory committee shall meet at the call of the
chairperson.
(b) Seven (7) members of the advisory committee constitute a
quorum if at least three (3) of the members present are voting
members.
(c) The affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members
appointed to the advisory committee is required for the advisory
committee to take action on any measure, including final reports.
Sec. 7. The advisory committee shall do the following, as
applicable:
(1) Review rules adopted by the ICC.
(2) Review legislative proposals suggested by the ICC.
(3) Evaluate the cannabis research and development program
under IC 7.1-9-5.
(4) Evaluate the operation of the cannabis programs.
(5) Consider any other matter that has bearing on the
operation of the medical and adult use cannabis programs.
Sec. 8. All meetings of the advisory committee are open to the
public in accordance with and subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records
of the advisory committee are subject to the requirements of
IC 5-14-3.
Sec. 9. The legislative services agency shall staff the advisory
committee.
Sec. 10. All funds necessary to carry out this chapter shall be
paid from appropriations to the legislative council and the
legislative services agency.
SECTION 2. IC 6-2.5-5-59 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 59. Transactions involving medical cannabis (as
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


defined in IC 7.1-8-1-1) and adult use cannabis (as defined in
IC 7.1-8-1-1) are exempt from the state gross retail tax if the
person acquiring the cannabis is a veteran (as defined in
IC 23-14-54.5-5).
SECTION 3. IC 6-7-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026].
(Controlled Substance Excise Tax).
SECTION 4. IC 6-7-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 5. Adult Use Cannabis Excise Tax
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Adult use cannabis" has the meaning set forth in
IC 7.1-8-1-1.
(2) "Department" means the department of state revenue.
(3) "Medical cannabis" has the meaning set forth in
IC 7.1-8-1-1.
(4) "Qualified retailer" has the meaning set forth in
IC 7.1-8-1-1.
Sec. 2. The adult use cannabis excise tax is imposed on adult use
cannabis sold in Indiana. The adult use cannabis excise tax is not
imposed on medical cannabis.
Sec. 3. The adult use cannabis excise tax is:
(1) one percent (1%) of the gross retail income received by the
qualified retailer for the purchase of adult use cannabis,
during the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026;
(2) two percent (2%) of the gross retail income received by the
qualified retailer for the purchase of adult use cannabis,
during the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027; and
(3) three percent (3%) of the gross retail income received by
the qualified retailer for the purchase of adult use cannabis,
during and after the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028.
Sec. 4. A qualified retailer shall collect the adult use cannabis
excise tax at the time the adult use cannabis is dispensed.
Sec. 5. Before the fifteenth day of each month, each qualified
retailer liable for the tax imposed by this chapter shall:
(1) file a return with the department that includes all
information required by the department, including the:
(A) name of the qualified retailer;
(B) address of the qualified retailer;
(C) invoice date;
(D) invoice number; and
(E) gross retail income received from the sale of adult use
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


cannabis dispensed during the preceding month; and
(2) pay the tax for which the qualified retailer is liable under
this chapter for the preceding month, minus the amount
specified in section 6 of this chapter.
All returns required to be filed and taxes required to be paid under
this chapter must be made in an electronic format prescribed by
the department.
Sec. 6. A qualified retailer that files a complete return and pays
the tax due within the time specified in section 5 of this chapter is
entitled to deduct and retain from the tax a collection allowance of
seven-thousandths (0.007) of the amount due. If a qualified retailer
files an incomplete report, the department may reduce the
collection allowance by an amount that does not exceed the lesser
of:
(1) ten percent (10%) of the collection allowance; or
(2) fifty dollars ($50).
Sec. 7. The department shall deposit the taxes collected under
this chapter in the state general fund.
SECTION 5. IC 7.1-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS A
NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 8. CANNABIS
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this article:
(1) "Adult cannabis user" means a person at least twenty-one
(21) years of age who has not been issued a patient or
caregiver identification card, unless the patient or caregiver
identification card has expired.
(2) "Adult use cannabis" means cannabis for use by a person
at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3) "Cannabis" means any part of the plant genus Cannabis.
(4) "Cannabis organization" means a qualified retailer, a
grower, a processor, or a testing laboratory.
(5) "Caregiver" means the individual designated by a patient
under this article to obtain, possess, deliver, and assist in the
administration of cannabis to the patient.
(6) "Certification" means the certification issued to a patient
by a physician under this article.
(7) "Family or household member" means a person described
in IC 35-31.5-2-128.
(8) "Form of cannabis" means the characteristics of the
cannabis recommended for a particular patient, including the
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


method of consumption, and any particular dosage, strain,
variety, quantity, or percentage of cannabis or of a particular
active ingredient.
(9) "Grower" means a person that holds a permit issued by
the ICC to grow cannabis.
(10) "ICC" means the Indiana cannabis commission
established by IC 7.1-9-2-1.
(11) "INSPECT" means the Indiana scheduled prescription
electronic collection and tracking program established by
IC 25-1-13-4.
(12) "Medical cannabis" means cannabis for medical use.
(13) "Patient" means an individual who:
(A) has a serious medical condition; and
(B) meets the requirements for certification for the use of
cannabis under this article.
(14) "Patient or caregiver identification card" means a
document issued to a patient or caregiver by the ICC
authorizing access to cannabis.
(15) "Permit" means an authorization issued by the ICC to a
cannabis organization to conduct activities under this article.
(16) "Processor" means a person that holds a permit issued by
the ICC to process or convert cannabis into a marketable
form.
(17) "Qualified retailer" means a person that holds a permit
issued by the ICC to sell cannabis.
(18) "Serious medical condition" means a medical condition
for which, in the professional opinion of a physician, the
benefits of treatment with cannabis are greater than the risks
of treatment with cannabis.
(19) "Testing laboratory" means a laboratory that analyzes
cannabis.
(20) "Transporter" means a person who transports cannabis
or paraphernalia. The term includes a person who does not
possess a permit or patient or caregiver identification card.
Chapter 2. Cannabis Program
Sec. 1. (a) The cannabis program is established to serve:
(1) patients suffering from a serious medical condition; and
(2) adult cannabis users.
(b) The ICC shall administer the program.
(c) The ICC has regulatory, enforcement, and exporting
authority over the growing, processing, sale, transporting, and use
of medical and adult use cannabis. The ICC shall contract with the
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


state chemist for the testing and growing of medical and adult use
cannabis.
Sec. 2. The ICC shall do the following:
(1) Issue a permit to a qualifying cannabis organization
authorizing the cannabis organization to grow, process, sell,
or test cannabis.
(2) Establish and maintain an electronic data base to store
and track information relating to the cannabis program. The
electronic data base must:
(A) have the ability to authenticate in real time a patient or
caregiver identification card presented to a qualified
retailer;
(B) track in real time the amount of cannabis provided to:
(i) a patient or caregiver; or
(ii) an adult cannabis user;
at a qualified retailer, share this information in real time
with other qualified retailers to prevent diversion, and
issue a "stop sale" warning if a purchaser will exceed the
allowable amount of cannabis that the purchaser may
possess;
(C) store records relating to a certification, including, if
applicable, the recommended form of cannabis and any
early expiration date recommended by the physician; and
(D) track the cultivation, processing, transport, storage,
and sale of cannabis.
(3) Maintain within the ICC's electronic data base an
electronic directory of patients and caregivers approved to
use or assist in the administration of medical cannabis.
(4) Develop enforcement procedures, including announced
and unannounced inspections of:
(A) a qualified retailer;
(B) a grower facility;
(C) a processor facility; and
(D) all records of a cannabis organization.
(5) Establish a program to authorize the use of cannabis for
research purposes, and issue documents to permit a research
facility to obtain cannabis for research purposes.
(6) Establish and maintain public outreach programs about
the cannabis program, including:
(A) a dedicated telephone number for adult cannabis users,
patients, caregivers, and members of the public to obtain
basic information about the sale of medical and adult use
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


cannabis; and
(B) a publicly accessible website containing information
similar to that described in clause (A).
(7) Collaborate as necessary with other state agencies, and
contract with third parties as necessary to carry out the
cannabis program, including public education campaigns
regarding the dangers of impaired driving and inappropriate
consumption by youth.
(8) Develop record keeping requirements for all books and
papers, any electronic data base or tracking system data, and
other information of a cannabis organization. Information
shall be retained for at least four (4) years unless otherwise
provided by the ICC.
(9) Restrict the advertising and marketing of cannabis, which
must be consistent with the federal regulations governing
prescription drug advertising and marketing.
Sec. 3. The ICC shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this article.
Sec. 4. (a) The ICC shall maintain a confidential list of patients
and caregivers to whom it has issued patient or caregiver
identification cards. Except as provided in subsection (b), all
information obtained by the ICC relating to patients, caregivers,
and other applicants is confidential.
(b) The following records are public:
(1) An application for a permit submitted by a cannabis
organization.
(2) Information relating to penalties or other disciplinary
actions taken against a cannabis organization for violation of
this article.
Chapter 3. Use of Cannabis
Sec. 1. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the use,
possession, delivery, distribution, transport, cultivation, or
manufacture of:
(1) cannabis; or
(2) paraphernalia used in connection with cannabis;
is lawful if the use or possession complies with this article.
However, this article does not authorize a person to operate a
motor vehicle, a motorboat, or any other device or equipment
while under the influence of cannabis.
Sec. 2. The use of medical cannabis is subject to the following:
(1) Cannabis may be sold only to:
(A) a patient who receives a certification from a physician
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


and is in possession of a valid patient or caregiver
identification card issued by the ICC that authorizes sale
of cannabis to the patient;
(B) a caregiver who possesses a valid patient or caregiver
identification card issued by the ICC; or
(C) a research facility authorized by the ICC, under terms
and conditions established by the ICC.
(2) If a physician has ordered that cannabis be sold in a
specific form, cannabis may be sold only in that form.
(3) An individual may not act as a caregiver for more than ten
(10) patients.
(4) A patient may designate up to two (2) caregivers at any
one (1) time.
(5) Cannabis that has not been used by the patient shall be
kept in the original package in which it was sold.
(6) A patient or caregiver shall possess a patient or caregiver
identification card whenever the patient or caregiver is in
possession of cannabis.
Sec. 3. The use of adult use cannabis is subject to the following:
(1) Adult use cannabis may be sold only to an adult cannabis
user.
(2) In any thirty (30) day period, an adult cannabis user may
possess not more than one (1) ounce of cannabis.
(3) If cannabis is transported in a motor vehicle, it must be
kept in a secured and sealed container.
(4) An adult cannabis user may not cultivate cannabis.
(5) To purchase adult use cannabis, the purchaser must
present a valid, government issued photo identification card
displaying the person's date of birth.
Sec. 4. A product packaged by a cannabis organization may be
identified only by:
(1) the name of the grower or processor;
(2) the name of the qualified retailer;
(3) the form and species of cannabis;
(4) the percentage of tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabinol
contained in the product;
(5) the harvest or manufacture date, as applicable; and
(6) any other labeling required by the ICC.
Sec. 5. (a) Except as expressly otherwise provided in this article,
the possession or use of cannabis is unlawful.
(b) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the
unlawful possession or use of cannabis may be a crime under
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


IC 35-48-4.
Sec. 6. The following acts are unlawful:
(1) To grow cannabis unless the person is a:
(A) grower that has received a permit from the ICC;
(B) patient with a valid patient or caregiver identification
card who is authorized to cultivate cannabis for personal
use under this article; or
(C) research facility authorized by the ICC.
(2) To sell cannabis unless the qualified retailer has received
a permit from the ICC.
Chapter 4. Physicians
Sec. 1. (a) A physician who issues a certification to a patient
under this article may not have an ownership interest in a cannabis
organization.
(b) A physician may issue a certification to a patient only if the
physician:
(1) establishes and intends to maintain a bona fide
physician-patient relationship with the patient for the
provision of medical services that is established by an
in-person visit and for which there is an expectation that the
physician will provide care to the patient on an ongoing basis;
or
(2) establishes coordination with the patient's existing
primary care physician for treatment of the patient's serious
medical condition.
(c) A physician who violates this section may be subject to
professional discipline.
Sec. 2. A physician may issue a certification to use cannabis to
a patient if the following requirements are met:
(1) The physician has determined that the patient has a
serious medical condition and has included the serious
medical condition in the patient's health care record.
(2) The patient is under the physician's continuing care for the
serious medical condition, except as provided in section
1(b)(2) of this chapter.
(3) The physician has determined the patient is likely to
receive therapeutic or palliative benefit from the use of
cannabis.
Sec. 3. A physician issuing a certification under section 1(b)(2)
of this chapter may not issue a certification unless the physician
has contacted the patient's existing primary care physician to
discuss the patient's serious medical condition and which form of
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


cannabis the patient is likely to benefit from.
Sec. 4. A certification must include the following information:
(1) The patient's name, date of birth, and address.
(2) The specific serious medical condition of the patient.
(3) A statement by the physician that the patient has a serious
medical condition and the patient is under continuing care for
the serious medical condition that is provided by:
(A) the physician; or
(B) the patient's existing primary care physician (as
described under section 1(b)(2) of this chapter).
(4) The date of issuance.
(5) The name, address, telephone number, and signature of
the physician.
(6) Any requirement or limitation concerning the appropriate
form of cannabis, the maximum quantity of cannabis that the
patient may use, and any limitation on the duration of use, if
applicable.
Sec. 5. A physician shall do the following:
(1) Provide the certification to the patient.
(2) Provide a copy of the certification to the ICC, which shall
place the information in the patient directory within the ICC's
electronic data base. The certification may be transmitted to
the ICC electronically.
(3) File a copy of the certification in the patient's health care
record.
Sec. 6. A physician may not issue a certification for the
physician's own use or for the use of a family or household member
of the physician.
Chapter 5. Certification Form
Sec. 1. The ICC shall develop a standard certification form,
which the ICC shall provide to a physician upon request. The form
must be available electronically. The form must include a
statement that a false statement made by a physician is punishable
under the penalties of perjury.
Chapter 6. Patients
Sec. 1. The ICC shall issue a patient or caregiver identification
card to a patient who has a valid certification and who otherwise
meets the requirements of this article.
Sec. 2. The ICC shall issue a patient or caregiver identification
card to a caregiver designated by the patient in accordance with
this article.
Sec. 3. Except as provided in section 4 of this chapter, a patient
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


or caregiver identification card issued to a patient authorizes the
patient to obtain and use cannabis as authorized by this article.
Except as provided in section 4 of this chapter, a patient or
caregiver identification card issued to a caregiver authorizes the
caregiver to obtain cannabis on behalf of the patient.
Sec. 4. (a) A patient holding a valid patient or caregiver
identification card may cultivate cannabis for the patient's own use
if the patient complies with the following requirements:
(1) The patient notifies the ICC on or before the date that the
patient begins cultivation and informs the ICC of the number
of plants the patient intends to cultivate and the location of
cultivation.
(2) The patient cultivates not more than six (6) plants.
(3) Not more than three (3) of the plants may be mature at
any one (1) time.
(4) Cannabis from the plant is used only for the patient's
personal use.
(5) Not later than thirty (30) days before the expected date
that the plants become mature, the patient notifies the ICC of
the anticipated maturity date.
(b) If the mature plants of a patient cultivating cannabis for the
patient's own use die, become damaged, or are otherwise unable to
produce cannabis for medical use, the patient shall notify the ICC,
which shall reinstate the patient's authorization to obtain cannabis
from a qualified retailer not later than fifteen (15) days after
receipt of the notice.
Chapter 7. Patient or Caregiver Identification Cards
Sec. 1. The ICC shall do the following:
(1) Review applications for patient or caregiver identification
cards.
(2) Review certifications submitted by physicians.
(3) Issue patient or caregiver identification cards to patients
and caregivers.
(4) Note in the electronic data base if a patient or caregiver
identification card may not be used to obtain cannabis from
a qualified retailer because the patient is cultivating the
patient's own cannabis.
Sec. 2. A patient or caregiver may apply, in a form and manner
prescribed by the ICC, for issuance or renewal of a patient or
caregiver identification card. A caregiver must submit a separate
application for issuance or renewal. Each application must include:
(1) the name, address, and date of birth of the patient;
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(2) the name, address, and date of birth of a caregiver, if
applicable;
(3) a copy of the certification issued by the physician;
(4) the name, address, and telephone number of the physician;
(5) the signature of the applicant and the date signed; and
(6) any other information required by the ICC.
Sec. 3. The fee to apply for or to renew a patient or caregiver
identification card is fifty dollars ($50). The ICC may waive or
reduce the fee if the applicant demonstrates financial hardship.
Sec. 4. The ICC shall make application and renewal forms
available on the ICC's website.
Sec. 5. (a) The patient or caregiver identification card of a
patient or caregiver expires one (1) year after the date of issuance,
unless a physician has specified that a patient should use cannabis
for less than one (1) year.
(b) If a physician has specified that a patient's use of cannabis
should be limited to certain forms of cannabis, the forms of
cannabis must be listed on the patient or caregiver identification
card.
Sec. 6. (a) The ICC shall issue separate patient or caregiver
identification cards for a patient and a caregiver as soon as
reasonably practicable after receiving a properly completed
application.
(b) If the ICC determines that an application is incomplete or
factually inaccurate, the ICC shall promptly notify the applicant.
(c) If a patient application designates an individual as a
caregiver who is not authorized to be a caregiver, the ICC shall
deny that portion of the application, but may approve the balance
of the application.
Sec. 7. (a) A patient or caregiver who has been issued a patient
or caregiver identification card shall notify the ICC not later than
ten (10) days after any change of name or address.
(b) A patient shall notify the ICC not later than ten (10) days
after a physician has determined the patient no longer has the
serious medical condition noted on the certification.
Sec. 8. (a) If the patient or caregiver identification card of a
patient or caregiver is lost, stolen, destroyed, or made illegible, the
patient or caregiver shall apply to the ICC for a replacement card
not later than ten (10) days after discovery of the loss or
defacement. The application for a replacement card shall be on a
form furnished by the ICC and, except as provided in subsection
(b), accompanied by a twenty-five dollar ($25) fee. The ICC may
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


establish higher fees for issuance of second and subsequent
replacement patient or caregiver identification cards.
(b) The ICC may waive or reduce the fee in cases of
demonstrated financial hardship.
(c) The ICC shall issue a replacement patient or caregiver
identification card as soon as practicable.
(d) A patient or caregiver may not obtain cannabis from a
qualified retailer until the ICC issues the replacement patient or
caregiver identification card.
Sec. 9. The patient or caregiver identification card must contain
the following information:
(1) The name of the patient or caregiver, as applicable. The
patient or caregiver identification card must also state
whether the individual is designated as a patient or as a
caregiver.
(2) The date of issuance and expiration date.
(3) A unique identification number for the patient or
caregiver, as applicable.
(4) A photograph of the individual to whom the patient or
caregiver identification card is issued.
(5) Any requirement or limitation set by the physician as to
the form of cannabis.
(6) Any other requirements as determined by the ICC.
However, the ICC may not require that a patient or caregiver
identification card disclose the patient's serious medical
condition.
The ICC shall establish guidelines specifying an acceptable
photograph under subdivision (4) and shall provide a reasonable
accommodation for a patient who is confined to the patient's home
or is in inpatient care.
Sec. 10. The ICC shall monthly transmit fees received under this
chapter to the state comptroller for deposit in the state general
fund.
Chapter 8. Caregivers
Sec. 1. (a) A caregiver must be at least eighteen (18) years of
age.
(b) A caregiver may be less than twenty-one (21) years of age
only if the ICC determines that it is in the best interests of the
patient that a specific person less than twenty-one (21) years of age
serves as a caregiver.
Sec. 2. (a) A patient may terminate a person's designation as
caregiver at any time.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(b) The patient shall notify the ICC that the patient has
terminated the person's caregiver designation as soon as
reasonably practicable after the termination.
(c) Upon learning that a patient has terminated a person's
caregiver designation, the ICC shall cancel the caregiver's patient
or caregiver identification card and notify the caregiver to return
the physical copy of the card.
Sec. 3. If a patient designates a caregiver, the caregiver may
submit an application for a patient or caregiver identification card
as a caregiver. The caregiver application must include:
(1) the name, address, and date of birth of the caregiver;
(2) if the caregiver has a patient or caregiver identification
card for the caregiver (as a patient) or another patient (as a
caregiver), the expiration date of each patient or caregiver
identification card; and
(3) any other information required by the ICC.
The application must be signed and dated by the caregiver
applicant and verified under penalties of perjury.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), before the
caregiver application is approved, the caregiver must authorize the
ICC to perform a national criminal history background check of
the caregiver.
(b) The caregiver is responsible for the fee for the national
criminal history background check.
(c) The ICC may conduct only one (1) national criminal history
background check of the caregiver per year.
Sec. 5. The caregiver shall pay an application fee of fifty dollars
($50). The ICC may waive or reduce the fee in cases of
demonstrated financial hardship.
Sec. 6. After receiving the caregiver application, the fee, and the
results of the national criminal history background check, the ICC
shall:
(1) verify the information contained in the application; and
(2) review INSPECT with respect to the caregiver applicant.
Sec. 7. The ICC shall monthly transmit fees received under this
chapter to the state comptroller for deposit in the state general
fund.
Chapter 9. Minor Patients
Sec. 1. If a patient is less than eighteen (18) years of age, the
following apply:
(1) The patient must have a caregiver.
(2) The caregiver must be:
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(A) the patient's parent or legal guardian;
(B) an individual designated by a parent or legal guardian;
or
(C) an appropriate individual approved by the ICC on a
sufficient showing that no parent or legal guardian is
appropriate or available.
Chapter 10. Suspension
Sec. 1. If a patient or caregiver knowingly, intentionally, or
recklessly:
(1) violates any provision of this article; or
(2) transfers or sells cannabis to a person not qualified as a
patient under this article;
the ICC may suspend or revoke the patient's or caregiver's patient
or caregiver identification card. The suspension or revocation is in
addition to any criminal or other penalty.
Chapter 11. General Prohibitions
Sec. 1. A person may not operate a motor vehicle, including a
motorboat, while under the influence of cannabis.
Sec. 2. A person may not perform any employment duties in
exposed high places or in confined spaces while under the influence
of cannabis.
Sec. 3. A person's employer may prohibit a person from
performing any task while under the influence of cannabis. The
prohibition is not an adverse employment decision or unlawful
discrimination even if the prohibition results in financial harm for
the person.
Chapter 12. Cannabis Organizations
Sec. 1. The following entities may receive a permit to operate as
a cannabis organization to grow, process, or sell cannabis:
(1) A grower.
(2) A processor.
(3) A qualified retailer.
Sec. 2. (a) The ICC shall develop an application for a:
(1) grower permit allowing the grower to grow cannabis;
(2) qualified retailer permit allowing a qualified retailer to sell
cannabis;
(3) processor permit allowing a processor to process cannabis;
and
(4) testing laboratory permit allowing a testing laboratory to
test cannabis.
(b) The following information must be included in the permit
application:
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(1) The name, address, telephone number, and other contact
information for every person having an ownership interest in
the cannabis organization.
(2) Information relating to a similar permit, license, or other
authorization granted in another jurisdiction, including any
suspensions, revocations, or discipline in that jurisdiction.
(3) A release authorizing the ICC to conduct a background
check of the persons having an ownership interest in the
cannabis organization.
(4) A statement as to whether the cannabis organization
intends to operate as a grower, a processor, or a qualified
retailer, and a concise description of the business activities in
which the cannabis organization intends to engage.
(5) The address or other location where the cannabis
organization intends to operate.
(6) A statement that no person having an ownership interest
in the cannabis organization has a felony conviction related to
the production, possession, or sale of marijuana that has not
been expunged and that was entered within the three (3) years
prior to submission of the permit application.
(7) Any other information required by the ICC.
(c) A permit application described in this section shall be
verified and completed subject to the penalties of perjury.
(d) An applicant shall submit the appropriate application and
permit fees at the time the applicant submits the application.
Chapter 13. Cannabis Organization Permits
Sec. 1. Subject to the limits and conditions described in section
10 of this chapter, the ICC may grant a cannabis organization a
permit if the ICC makes the following findings:
(1) The applicant will maintain effective control of cannabis
in the custody of the applicant.
(2) The applicant will comply with all state statutes, all rules
adopted by the ICC, and any ordinances adopted by a
governmental unit.
(3) The applicant has the ability to properly carry out the
activity for which the permit is sought.
(4) The applicant has sufficient financial means to acquire all
property, equipment, and permits required to properly grow,
process, or sell cannabis.
(5) The applicant is able to implement and maintain
appropriate security, tracking, record keeping, and
surveillance systems relating to the acquisition, possession,
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


growth, manufacture, delivery, transportation, distribution,
or sale of cannabis.
(6) The applicant satisfies any other conditions required
under rules adopted by the ICC.
(7) Granting a permit to the applicant serves the public
interest.
Sec. 2. If the ICC finds that information included in the
application is insufficient for the ICC to grant a permit to the
cannabis organization, the ICC may request that the applicant
submit additional documentation relating to one (1) or more items
listed in section 1 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided under subsection (b), a permit
granted under this chapter is nontransferable.
(b) A permit holder may transfer a permit to a person
authorized to hold a permit in accordance with rules adopted by
the ICC if:
(1) the permit holder has held the permit for at least
twenty-four (24) months; or
(2) the transfer is necessary due to the death or disability of
the permit holder or a similar severe hardship. For purposes
of this subdivision, financial hardship is not a severe hardship.
Sec. 4. A permit granted under this chapter is valid for one (1)
year after the date of issuance.
Sec. 5. (a) A permit may be renewed for one (1) or more
additional one (1) year periods.
(b) The ICC shall establish deadlines for filing a renewal
application that provide the ICC with sufficient time to review the
application without causing an interruption in the cannabis
organization's activities.
(c) The same standards that apply for granting an initial
application apply to an application for renewal. In determining
whether the renewal of a permit serves the public interest, the ICC
shall consider the manner in which the renewal applicant has
operated the cannabis organization and complied with all relevant
laws.
Sec. 6. A permit issued by the ICC to a cannabis organization
must include the following information:
(1) The name and address of the cannabis organization.
(2) The type of permit.
(3) The activities that are permitted under the permit.
(4) A description of the property and facilities authorized to
be used by the cannabis organization.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(5) Any other information required by the ICC.
Sec. 7. The ICC may suspend or revoke all or part of a permit
granted under this chapter if, following a hearing, the ICC finds
any of the following:
(1) That one (1) or more of the determinations made under
section 1 of this chapter are no longer valid.
(2) That the cannabis organization knowingly or intentionally
sold or distributed cannabis to a person not permitted to
receive cannabis under this article.
(3) That the cannabis organization has failed to maintain
effective control against diversion of cannabis.
(4) That the cannabis organization has violated a provision of
this article or a rule adopted by the ICC.
(5) That the cannabis organization has failed to comply with
another law regulating controlled substances.
Sec. 8. (a) An applicant for a permit has a continuing duty to
notify the ICC of any material change in facts or circumstances
relating to the applicant's application, including a change in
ownership.
(b) An applicant's duty to notify the ICC begins on the date the
applicant submits the application and continues for as long as the
applicant holds a permit.
Sec. 9. The ICC may, upon request of a permit holder, amend an
existing permit to authorize a permit holder to:
(1) move the permit holder's operations from one (1) location
to another; or
(2) perform additional activities, or cease the performance of
certain activities now performed, at the permit holder's
facility;
if the ICC finds that the amendment is reasonable under the
circumstances.
Sec. 10. (a) The ICC shall initially issue:
(1) ten (10) processor permits; and
(2) one hundred (100) grower permits.
(b) The ICC shall ensure that, to the extent practicable:
(1) at least one (1) processor permit is issued for a facility
located in each geographical region described in
IC 10-11-2-5(d);
(2) at least three (3) grower permits are issued for cultivation
in each geographical region described in IC 10-11-2-5(d); and
(3) the persons receiving a permit reflect the diversity and
makeup of Indiana.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(c) The ICC may issue additional permits in order to meet the
demand for cannabis in Indiana and to ensure a competitive
market. The ICC shall annually complete a market analysis to
determine whether additional permits are needed to continue the
capture of market share from illicit sources. The ICC shall hold
public hearings as part of the market analysis to hear from
consumers, market stakeholders, and potential new applicants.
Chapter 14. General Duties of a Permit Holder
Sec. 1. The holder of a permit must do the following:
(1) Report the loss, theft, or unexplained disappearance of
cannabis to a law enforcement agency not later than
twenty-four (24) hours after the loss, theft, or disappearance
is discovered.
(2) Permit announced or unannounced inspections by the ICC
of all cannabis organization facilities and records.
Chapter 15. Application and Permit Fees
Sec. 1. The following fees apply to a grower:
(1) A nonrefundable grower permit application fee of five
hundred dollars ($500).
(2) A refundable grower permit fee of two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500).
(3) A refundable grower permit renewal fee of one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
(4) A nonrefundable permit amendment fee of two hundred
fifty dollars ($250).
Sec. 2. The following fees apply to a processor:
(1) A nonrefundable processor permit application fee of two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(2) A refundable processor permit fee of ten thousand dollars
($10,000).
(3) A refundable processor permit renewal fee of five
thousand dollars ($5,000).
(4) A nonrefundable permit amendment fee of two hundred
fifty dollars ($250).
Sec. 3. The following fees apply to a qualified retailer:
(1) A nonrefundable qualified retailer permit application fee
of two hundred dollars ($200).
(2) A refundable qualified retailer permit fee of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each qualified retailer location.
(3) A refundable qualified retailer permit renewal fee of seven
hundred fifty dollars ($750) for each qualified retailer
location.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(4) A nonrefundable permit amendment fee of two hundred
fifty dollars ($250).
Sec. 4. The following fees apply to a testing laboratory:
(1) A nonrefundable testing laboratory permit application fee
of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) A refundable testing laboratory permit fee of two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each testing
laboratory location.
(3) A refundable testing laboratory permit renewal fee of two
thousand dollars ($2,000) for each testing laboratory location.
(4) A nonrefundable permit amendment fee of two hundred
fifty dollars ($250).
Sec. 5. An applicant must submit the application fee and permit
fee at the time the applicant submits the application.
Sec. 6. (a) The ICC shall retain the application fee even if the
application is not approved.
(b) The ICC shall refund the permit fee and renewal fee if the
permit or renewal is not approved. However, the permit fee and
renewal fee are not refundable if the permit is initially granted but
later suspended or revoked.
(c) The ICC shall retain the permit amendment fee even if the
application for amendment is not approved.
Sec. 7. The ICC shall transfer all fees to the state comptroller
for deposit in the state general fund.
Chapter 16. Tracking and Record Keeping
Sec. 1. (a) A cannabis organization shall implement an electronic
inventory tracking system, which must be directly accessible to the
ICC through an electronic data base that is updated at least one (1)
time each day.
(b) The electronic inventory tracking system must include the
following:
(1) For a grower, a seed to sale tracking system that tracks the
cannabis from seed to plant until the cannabis is sold or
transferred to its final destination.
(2) For a processor, a system that tracks cannabis from its
purchase from a grower to its transfer to a qualified retailer,
testing laboratory, or research facility as authorized by this
article.
(3) For a qualified retailer, a system that tracks cannabis from
its purchase from a grower or processor to its sale to an adult
cannabis user, patient, or caregiver, or its transfer to a testing
laboratory, research facility, grower, or processor as
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


authorized by this article.
(4) For a qualified retailer, a system to verify that a patient or
caregiver identification card presented by a patient or
caregiver purchasing cannabis:
(A) is valid; and
(B) authorizes the patient or caregiver to receive cannabis
from a qualified retailer.
(5) For a qualified retailer, a system to record and transmit
the identification of an adult cannabis user and the quantity
and form of cannabis purchased to ensure that the adult
cannabis user complies with possession limits.
(6) For a cannabis organization, a:
(A) daily log of each day's beginning inventory,
acquisitions, amounts purchased and sold, disbursements,
disposals, and ending inventory, including prices paid and
amounts collected from adult cannabis users, patients, and
caregivers;
(B) system to recall defective cannabis; and
(C) system to track the waste resulting from the growth of
cannabis, including the name and address of a disposal
service.
Sec. 2. A cannabis organization must implement a plan for:
(1) security and surveillance; and
(2) record keeping and record retention.
Sec. 3. The ICC:
(1) shall require a cannabis organization to make an annual
report to the ICC; and
(2) may require a cannabis organization to make a quarterly
report to the ICC.
The ICC shall determine the form and contents of the report and
may make all or part of the report available to the public.
Chapter 17. Grower Operations
Sec. 1. A person holding a grower permit may do all the
following in accordance with rules adopted by the ICC:
(1) Obtain seed and plant material from another grower.
(2) Sell and transport seed and plant material to another
grower or processor.
(3) Sell and transport cannabis to a processor, qualified
retailer, testing laboratory, or research facility authorized by
the ICC.
The ICC may authorize a person holding a grower permit to sell
and transport seed, plant material, and cannabis to a grower,
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


processor, qualified retailer, testing laboratory, or research facility
in another state.
Sec. 2. The ICC shall determine the manner in which cannabis
may be grown, harvested, and stored at the cultivation or
harvesting facility.
Sec. 3. The ICC shall determine the manner in which
transportation of cannabis shall be conducted between or among
growers, processors, qualified retailers, testing laboratories, or
research facilities. Rules adopted by the ICC must include the
following:
(1) Requirements relating to shipping containers and
packaging.
(2) The manner in which trucks, vans, trailers, or other
carriers will be secured.
(3) Obtaining copies of driver's licenses and registrations and
other information related to security and tracking.
(4) The use of a GPS tracking system.
(5) Record keeping requirements for delivery and receipt of
cannabis products.
Sec. 4. A grower shall contract with an independent testing
laboratory to test the cannabis produced by the grower. The ICC
shall approve the testing laboratory and require that the testing
laboratory report testing results in the manner determined by the
ICC. If a grower learns that the grower's sample has failed
required testing, the grower must take steps to remediate the
harvest to allowable levels under IC 7.1-8-20-3, or immediately
dispose of the harvest.
Chapter 18. Processor Operations
Sec. 1. A person holding a processor permit may do all the
following in accordance with rules adopted by the ICC:
(1) Obtain cannabis from a grower.
(2) Sell and transport processed cannabis to another grower
or processor.
(3) Sell and transport cannabis to a processor, qualified
retailer, testing laboratory, or research facility authorized by
the ICC.
The ICC shall authorize a person holding a processor permit to sell
and transport processed cannabis to a grower, processor, qualified
retailer, testing laboratory, or research facility in another state if
the person meets the requirements established by the ICC.
Sec. 2. The ICC shall determine the manner in which cannabis
may be processed or stored at the processor facility.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


Sec. 3. The ICC shall determine the manner in which
transportation of cannabis shall be conducted between or among
cannabis organizations and research facilities. Rules adopted by
the ICC must include the following:
(1) Requirements relating to shipping containers and
packaging.
(2) The manner in which trucks, vans, trailers, or other
carriers will be secured.
(3) Obtaining copies of driver's licenses and registrations and
other information related to security and tracking.
(4) The use of a GPS tracking system.
(5) Record keeping requirements for delivery and receipt of
cannabis products.
Sec. 4. A processor shall develop a plan to ensure that cannabis
products are properly labeled, are not packaged in a manner that
is appealing to children, and are placed in child resistant
packaging.
Sec. 5. A processor shall include on its labeling of cannabis
products the following:
(1) The number of doses contained within the package, the
species, and the percentage of tetrahydrocannabinol and
cannabinol.
(2) A warning that the cannabis must be kept in the original
container in which it was sold.
(3) A warning that unauthorized use is unlawful and will
subject the person to criminal penalties.
(4) A list of ingredients.
(5) The manufacture or harvest date.
(6) Any other information required by the ICC.
Sec. 6. A processor shall contract with an independent testing
laboratory to test the cannabis product produced by the processor.
The testing laboratory must be approved by the ICC, and the ICC
shall require that the testing laboratory report testing results in the
manner determined by the ICC. If a processor learns that a sample
submitted by the processor has failed required testing, the
processor must take steps to remediate the product to allowable
levels under IC 7.1-8-20-3, or immediately dispose of the batch.
Chapter 19. Qualified Retailer Operations
Sec. 1. (a) A qualified retailer holding a valid permit under this
article may sell cannabis to a patient or caregiver upon
presentation of a valid patient or caregiver identification card for
that patient or caregiver and electronic verification that the patient
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


or caregiver identification card is valid and authorizes the patient
or caregiver to receive cannabis from a qualified retailer.
(b) A qualified retailer holding a valid permit under this article
may sell cannabis to an adult cannabis user upon presentation of
a valid government issued photo identification card containing the
person's date of birth, and electronic verification that:
(1) the sale will not permit the adult cannabis user to exceed
the limit described in section 3 of this chapter; and
(2) the adult cannabis user does not possess a valid, unexpired
certification.
Sec. 2. A qualified retailer shall provide to a purchaser a receipt
including all of the following:
(1) The name and address of the qualified retailer.
(2) The name and address of the purchaser.
(3) The date the cannabis was sold.
(4) For medical cannabis, any requirement or limitation by
the physician as to the form of cannabis for the patient.
(5) The form and the quantity of cannabis sold.
Sec. 3. A qualified retailer may not sell to a patient (or a
caregiver on behalf of a specific patient):
(1) in any thirty (30) day period:
(A) more cannabis than the maximum amount authorized
by the certification; or
(B) ten (10) ounces of cannabis;
whichever is less;
(2) subject to subdivision (1), more than two and one-half (2.5)
ounces of cannabis per day, of which not more than fifteen
(15) grams may be cannabis concentrate;
(3) a form of cannabis that is not authorized on the
certification; or
(4) cannabis, if the patient is cultivating mature cannabis
plants for the patient's own use.
Sec. 4. Cannabis packaging must include the following
information:
(1) The number of doses contained within the package, the
species, and the percentage of tetrahydrocannabinol and
cannabinol.
(2) A warning that the cannabis must be kept in the original
container in which it was sold.
(3) A warning that unauthorized use is unlawful and will
subject the person to criminal penalties.
(4) Any other information required by the ICC.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


Sec. 5. A qualified retailer:
(1) may sell cannabis only in an indoor, enclosed, secure
facility located in Indiana;
(2) may sell medical devices and instruments that are needed
to administer cannabis; and
(3) may sell services approved by the ICC related to the use of
cannabis.
Sec. 6. A qualified retailer shall post a copy of its permit in a
location within its facility in a manner that is easily observable by
the public.
Sec. 7. A qualified retailer shall establish a plan to:
(1) prevent diversion of cannabis and cannabis products; and
(2) ensure a patient is not sold more cannabis than is
permitted under this article.
Chapter 20. Testing Laboratory Operations
Sec. 1. A testing laboratory may test cannabis from a cannabis
organization in accordance with rules adopted by the ICC if the
testing laboratory:
(1) holds a valid permit issued under this article; or
(2) is already accredited as a testing laboratory to
International Organization for Standardization (ISO) 17025
by a third party accrediting body such as the American
Association for Laboratory Accreditation (A2LA) or Assured
Calibration and Laboratory Accreditation Select Services
(ACLASS).
Sec. 2. A testing laboratory shall maintain policies and
procedures for the secure and proper analytical testing of
cannabis, which must include:
(1) laboratory analysis techniques, including specific
instrumentation and protocols necessary to perform the tests
required by the ICC;
(2) the implementation of standards and methods for
conducting analysis of forms of cannabis in accordance with
the requirements of ISO/IEC 17025 "General Requirements
for the Competence of Testing and Calibration
Laboratories"; and
(3) methods of testing to detect:
(A) potency levels of tetrahydrocannabinol and
cannabinol;
(B) microbials;
(C) mycotoxins;
(D) pesticides;
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(E) residual solvents; and
(F) any other matter as required by the ICC.
Sec. 3. The ICC shall establish the allowable level of microbials,
mycotoxins, pesticides, residual solvents, and other matter
determined by the ICC. If a sample received from a grower or
processor exceeds allowable levels, the testing laboratory must
immediately notify the grower or processor from which the testing
laboratory received the sample.
Sec. 4. A person holding an ownership interest in a qualified
retailer, a grower, or a processor permit may not have an
ownership interest in a testing laboratory permit.
Chapter 21. Transportation
Sec. 1. A transporter may transport cannabis or paraphernalia
from a:
(1) grower or processor to a qualified retailer;
(2) grower or processor to a testing laboratory or research
facility authorized by the ICC;
(3) qualified retailer to a grower or processor;
(4) qualified retailer to a testing laboratory or research
facility authorized by the ICC;
(5) cannabis organization to another cannabis organization;
or
(6) cannabis organization to another person if authorized to
do so by the ICC;
if the transporter complies with this chapter.
Sec. 2. No employee of a transporter under this chapter who is
directly involved in the transport of cannabis or paraphernalia
may have a felony conviction related to the production, possession,
or sale of marijuana that was entered within the previous three (3)
years and that has not been expunged.
Sec. 3. Cannabis or paraphernalia transported under this
chapter must be:
(1) packed in a tamper resistant and tamper evident package;
(2) clearly marked as to quantity and contents; and
(3) securely stored in the vehicle used for transport.
Sec. 4. The transporter shall proceed as directly and
expeditiously as practicable from the shipping location to the
receiving location.
Sec. 5. The person who ships the cannabis or paraphernalia
shall provide the transporter with a shipping manifest clearly
stating the:
(1) exact quantity of cannabis or paraphernalia that is being
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


transported;
(2) address of the shipping location;
(3) address of the receiving location;
(4) identification of the person transporting the material; and
(5) time the person transporting the material left the shipping
location.
Sec. 6. The transporter shall keep the shipping manifest in the
transporter's possession at all times.
Sec. 7. The ICC may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to regulate the
transport of cannabis or paraphernalia. The ICC may authorize a
transporter to transport cannabis or paraphernalia out of state.
Chapter 22. Reports
Sec. 1. The ICC shall, not later than December 31 of each year,
submit a report concerning the cannabis program to the legislative
council, the governor, and the chief justice of the supreme court.
The report to the legislative council must be in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6.
Chapter 23. Civil Penalties
Sec. 1. The ICC may assess a civil penalty of not more than
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each violation of this article
or a rule adopted under this article. In addition, the ICC may
impose an additional penalty of not more than two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day of a continuing violation.
Sec. 2. (a) In determining the amount of a civil penalty imposed
under this chapter, the ICC shall consider the following:
(1) The seriousness of the violation.
(2) The potential harm resulting from the violation to adult
cannabis users, patients, caregivers, or the general public.
(3) The willfulness of the violation.
(4) Any previous violations.
(5) The economic benefit that accrued to the person who
committed the violation.
(b) If the ICC finds that the:
(1) violation did not threaten the safety or health of an adult
cannabis user, a patient, a caregiver, or the general public;
and
(2) violator took immediate action to remedy the violation
upon learning of it;
the ICC may issue a written warning instead of assessing a civil
penalty.
Sec. 3. In addition to the civil penalty described in this chapter
and any other penalty authorized by law, the ICC may revoke or
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


suspend a person's permit or patient or caregiver identification
card.
Chapter 24. Research
Sec. 1. (a) The ICC may provide assistance to universities,
research facilities, pharmaceutical companies, state agencies, and
similar entities that wish to conduct research concerning cannabis.
(b) The ICC may conduct research concerning cannabis.
Sec. 2. The ICC may authorize persons conducting research on
cannabis to obtain, possess, transport, and use cannabis for
research purposes, under terms and conditions established by the
ICC. The ICC shall issue appropriate documentation to allow
persons to obtain cannabis for research purposes.
Chapter 25. Employment
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "On call" means that an employee is scheduled with at
least twenty-four (24) hours notice by the employee's
employer to be on standby or otherwise responsible for
performing tasks related to the employee's employment either
at the employer's premises or other previously designated
location by the employee's employer or supervisor to perform
a work related task.
(2) "Workplace" means the employer's premises, including
any building, real property, and parking area under the
control of the employer or area used by an employee while in
performance of the employee's job duties, and vehicles,
whether leased, rented, or owned. The term includes another
location as defined by the employer's written employment
policy, to the extent that the policy is generally consistent with
this subdivision.
Sec. 2. This article does not:
(1) prohibit an employer from adopting reasonable zero
tolerance or drug free workplace policies, or employment
policies concerning drug testing, smoking, consumption,
storage, or use of cannabis in the workplace or while on call
provided that the policy is applied in a nondiscriminatory
manner;
(2) require an employer to permit an employee to be under
the influence of or use cannabis in the employer's workplace
or while performing the employee's job duties or while on
call; or
(3) limit or prevent an employer from disciplining an
employee or terminating employment of an employee for
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


violating an employer's employment policies or workplace
drug policies.
Sec. 3. For purposes of section 2 of this chapter, an employer
may consider an employee to be impaired by or under the influence
of cannabis if the employer has a good faith belief that an employee
manifests specific, articulable symptoms while working that
decrease or lessen the employee's performance of the duties or
tasks of the employee's job position, including symptoms of the
employee's speech, physical dexterity, agility, coordination,
demeanor, irrational or unusual behavior, or negligence or
carelessness in operating equipment or machinery; disregard for
the safety of the employee or others, or involvement in any accident
that results in serious damage to equipment or property;
disruption of a production or manufacturing process; or
carelessness that results in any injury to the employee or others. If
an employer elects to discipline an employee on the basis that the
employee is under the influence of or impaired by cannabis, the
employer must afford the employee a reasonable opportunity to
contest the basis of the determination.
Sec. 4. This article does not create or imply a cause of action for
any person against an employer for:
(1) actions, including subjecting an employee or applicant to
reasonable drug and alcohol testing under the employer's
workplace drug policy, including an employee's refusal to be
tested or to cooperate in testing procedures or disciplining or
termination of employment, based on the employer's good
faith belief that an employee used or possessed cannabis in the
employer's workplace or while performing the employee's job
duties or while on call in violation of the employer's
employment policies;
(2) actions, including discipline or termination of employment,
based on the employer's good faith belief that an employee
was impaired as a result of the use of cannabis, or under the
influence of cannabis, while at the employer's workplace or
while performing the employee's job duties or while on call in
violation of the employer's workplace drug policy; or
(3) injury, loss, or liability to a third party if the employer
neither knew nor had reason to know that the employee was
impaired.
Sec. 5. This article does not enhance or diminish protections
afforded by any other law.
Sec. 6. This article does not interfere with any federal, state, or
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


local restrictions on employment including the United States
Department of Transportation regulation 49 CFR 40.151(e) or
impact an employer's ability to comply with federal or state law or
cause an employer to lose any federal or state contract or funding.
SECTION 6. IC 7.1-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS A
NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 9. INDIANA CANNABIS COMMISSION
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 7.1-8-1-1 apply throughout this
article.
Chapter 2. General Provisions
Sec. 1. The Indiana cannabis commission (ICC) is established as
an agency of the executive branch of state government for purposes
of administering the cannabis program.
Sec. 2. (a) The ICC consists of:
(1) the ICC board;
(2) the executive director; and
(3) other employees necessary to carry out the duties of the
ICC.
(b) The ICC board is established as a continuing board of the
executive branch of state government.
(c) The ICC board consists of three (3) commissioners, who shall
direct and oversee the operation of the ICC.
Sec. 3. (a) The commissioners shall be appointed by the
governor.
(b) A commissioner serves for a term that ends June 30 of the
next odd-numbered year after appointment. A commissioner is
eligible for reappointment.
(c) Not more than two (2) commissioners may belong to the
same political party.
(d) A commissioner serves the commissioner's term at the
pleasure of the governor.
Sec. 4. To be eligible for appointment as a commissioner, an
individual must have the following qualifications:
(1) The individual may not be employed by the state in any
other capacity.
(2) The individual must have good moral character.
(3) The individual must have been a resident of Indiana for at
least ten (10) years immediately preceding the appointment.
Sec. 5. The governor shall appoint one (1) commissioner to serve
as chairperson of the ICC board, and one (1) commissioner to
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


serve as vice chairperson. The vice chairperson shall act as the
chairperson if the chairperson is unable to attend a meeting of the
ICC board. The chairperson and vice chairperson serve at the
pleasure of the governor.
Sec. 6. A commissioner appointed to fill a vacancy in the
membership of the ICC board shall serve only for the remainder
of the unexpired term. In all other respects, an appointment to fill
a vacancy shall be made in the same manner that an original
appointment is made.
Sec. 7. (a) As compensation for services, each commissioner is
entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). A commissioner is also entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the commissioner's duties as provided in the state policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(b) The expenses of the ICC board shall be paid from funds
appropriated to the ICC.
Sec. 8. Each commissioner shall execute:
(1) a surety bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars
($10,000), with surety approved by the governor; and
(2) an oath of office.
The surety bond and the oath of office shall be filed in the office of
the secretary of state.
Sec. 9. The required surety bond executed and filed on behalf of
a commissioner shall be made payable to the state of Indiana and
conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the commissioner's
duties.
Sec. 10. The ICC board shall hold meetings at the call of the
chairperson. The ICC board may establish rules governing
meetings.
Sec. 11. (a) Two (2) ICC commissioners constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business.
(b) Each commissioner has one (1) vote.
(c) Action of the ICC board may be taken only upon the
affirmative votes of at least two (2) commissioners.
Sec. 12. An ICC commissioner may not solicit or accept a
political contribution from a patient, a caregiver, or any individual
or entity that has a permit or has applied for a permit issued by the
ICC. However, the right of a commissioner to vote as the
commissioner chooses and to express the commissioner's opinions
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


on political subjects and candidates may not be impaired.
Chapter 3. Employees and Administration
Sec. 1. (a) The ICC board shall appoint an executive director to
assist the ICC in the efficient administration of its powers and
duties.
(b) The ICC board shall fix the salary of the executive director,
subject to the approval of the budget agency.
Sec. 2. The ICC has the power to employ all necessary
employees, determine their duties, and, subject to the approval of
the ICC board and the budget agency, fix their salaries.
Chapter 4. Powers and Duties
Sec. 1. The chairperson is the presiding officer at the meetings
of the ICC board. The chairperson, together with the executive
director, shall prepare, certify, and authenticate all proceedings,
minutes, records, rules, and regulations of the ICC board. The
chairperson shall also perform all other duties as imposed on the
chairperson by this title.
Sec. 2. The ICC has the power to organize its work, to enforce
and administer this article and IC 7.1-8, and to enforce and
administer the rules adopted by the ICC.
Sec. 3. The ICC shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to prescribe
the forms for all applications, documents, permits, patient or
caregiver identification cards, and licenses used in the
administration of this article and IC 7.1-8.
Sec. 4. The ICC has the following powers:
(1) To hold hearings before the ICC or the ICC's
representative.
(2) To take testimony and receive evidence.
(3) To conduct inquiries with or without a hearing.
(4) To receive reports of investigators or other governmental
officers and employees.
(5) To administer oaths.
(6) To subpoena witnesses and to compel them to appear and
testify.
(7) To certify copies of records of the ICC or any other
document or record on file with the ICC.
(8) To fix the form, mode, manner, time, and number of times
for the posting or publication of any required notices if not
otherwise provided.
(9) To adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry out this article
and IC 7.1-8.
Sec. 5. The ICC has the following duties:
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(1) To establish the cannabis program described in IC 7.1-8
and to adopt all necessary rules to implement the program.
(2) To implement protocols for the application and issuance
of a patient or caregiver identification card, including
protocols to:
(A) prevent fraud;
(B) ensure the accuracy of information contained in the
application; and
(C) protect the privacy of an applicant.
(3) To advise the general assembly concerning the
establishment of a program for the:
(A) manufacture;
(B) cultivation;
(C) advertising;
(D) transportation; and
(E) sale;
of cannabis.
(4) To encourage research concerning cannabis.
Chapter 5. Research and Development
Sec. 1. To permit and encourage research concerning cannabis:
(1) an accredited institution of higher education with a
physical presence in Indiana; and
(2) a pharmaceutical or agricultural business having a
research facility in Indiana;
may apply to the ICC for a license to conduct research concerning
cannabis.
Sec. 2. An application under this chapter must include the
following:
(1) The nature of the research project.
(2) The names of the individuals who will conduct the
research project.
(3) The approximate quantity of cannabis that will be used in
the research project.
(4) The security protocol to be implemented to ensure that
cannabis is not diverted for uses other than the research
project.
(5) Any other information required by the ICC.
Sec. 3. Upon receipt of a completed application, the ICC may
issue a research license to the accredited institution of higher
education or pharmaceutical or agricultural business. The research
license must specifically list the names of each individual
participating in the research project who will have custody or
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


control of cannabis for research purposes and the approximate
quantity of the cannabis that will be used in the research project.
Sec. 4. The ICC may charge a reasonable fee for issuance of a
research license.
SECTION 7. IC 9-30-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 85, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.(a) A person who operates a vehicle with an
alcohol concentration equivalent to at least eight-hundredths (0.08)
gram of alcohol but less than fifteen-hundredths (0.15) gram of alcohol
per:
(1) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(2) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath;
commits a Class C misdemeanor.
(b) A person who operates a vehicle with an alcohol concentration
equivalent to at least fifteen-hundredths (0.15) gram of alcohol per:
(1) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(2) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person who operates a vehicle with a controlled substance
listed in schedule I or II of IC 35-48-2 or its metabolite, not including
THC, in the person's blood commits a Class C misdemeanor.
(d) It is a defense to subsection (c) that:
(1) the accused person consumed the controlled substance in
accordance with a valid prescription or order of a practitioner (as
defined in IC 35-48-1.1) who acted in the course of the
practitioner's professional practice; or
(2) the:
(A) controlled substance is marijuana or a metabolite of
marijuana;
(B) person was not intoxicated;
(C) person did not cause a traffic accident; and
(D) substance was identified by means of a chemical test taken
pursuant to IC 9-30-7.
(e) A person who:
(1) operates a vehicle with at least five (5) nanograms of THC
per milliliter of the person's whole blood; and
(2) is impaired;
commits a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 8. IC 9-30-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 86, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A person who causes serious bodily injury
to another person when operating a vehicle:
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(1) with an alcohol concentration equivalent to at least
eight-hundredths (0.08) gram of alcohol per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath;
(2) with a controlled substance listed in schedule I or II of
IC 35-48-2 or its metabolite, not including THC, in the person's
blood;
(3) with at least five (5) nanograms of THC per milliliter of
the person's whole blood; or
(3) (4) while intoxicated;
commits a Level 5 felony. However, the offense is a Level 4 felony if
the person has a previous conviction of operating while intoxicated
within the five (5) years preceding the commission of the offense.
(b) A person who violates subsection (a) commits a separate offense
for each person whose serious bodily injury is caused by the violation
of subsection (a).
(c) It is a defense under subsection (a)(2) that the accused person
consumed the controlled substance in accordance with a valid
prescription or order of a practitioner (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1) who
acted in the course of the practitioner's professional practice.
SECTION 9. IC 9-30-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 87, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A person who causes the death or
catastrophic injury of another person when operating a vehicle:
(1) with an alcohol concentration equivalent to at least
eight-hundredths (0.08) gram of alcohol per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath;
(2) with a controlled substance listed in schedule I or II of
IC 35-48-2 or its metabolite, not including THC, in the person's
blood;
(3) with at least five (5) nanograms of THC per milliliter of
the person's whole blood; or
(3) (4) while intoxicated;
commits a Level 4 felony.
(b) A person who causes the death of a law enforcement animal (as
defined in IC 35-46-3-4.5) when operating a vehicle:
(1) with an alcohol concentration equivalent to at least
eight-hundredths (0.08) gram of alcohol per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath; or
(2) with a controlled substance listed in schedule I or II of
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


IC 35-48-2 or its metabolite, not including THC, in the person's
blood; or
(3) with at least five (5) nanograms of THC per milliliter of
the person's whole blood;
commits a Level 6 felony.
(c) A person who commits an offense under subsection (a) or (b)
commits a separate offense for each person or law enforcement animal
whose death (or catastrophic injury, in the case of a person) is caused
by the violation of subsection (a) or (b).
(d) It is a defense under subsection (a) or (b) that the person accused
of causing the death or catastrophic injury of another person or the
death of a law enforcement animal when operating a vehicle with a
controlled substance listed in schedule I or II of IC 35-48-2 or its
metabolite in the person's blood consumed the controlled substance in
accordance with a valid prescription or order of a practitioner (as
defined in IC 35-48-1.1) who acted in the course of the practitioner's
professional practice.
SECTION 10. IC 9-30-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2021,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A physician, a person trained in retrieving
contraband or obtaining bodily substance samples and acting under the
direction of or under a protocol prepared by a physician, or a licensed
health care professional acting within the professional's scope of
practice and under the direction of or under a protocol prepared by a
physician, who:
(1) obtains a blood, urine, or other bodily substance sample from
a person, regardless of whether the sample is taken for diagnostic
purposes or at the request of a law enforcement officer under this
section;
(2) performs a chemical test on blood, urine, or other bodily
substance obtained from a person; or
(3) searches for or retrieves contraband from the body cavity of an
individual;
shall deliver the sample or contraband or disclose the results of the test
to a law enforcement officer who requests the sample, contraband, or
results as a part of a criminal investigation. Samples, contraband, and
test results shall be provided to a law enforcement officer even if the
person has not consented to or otherwise authorized their release.
(b) A physician, a licensed health care professional, a hospital, or an
agent of a physician or hospital is not civilly or criminally liable for any
of the following:
(1) Disclosing test results in accordance with this section.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(2) Delivering contraband, or a blood, urine, or other bodily
substance sample in accordance with this section.
(3) Searching for or retrieving contraband or obtaining a blood,
urine, or other bodily substance sample in accordance with this
section.
(4) Disclosing to the prosecuting attorney or the deputy
prosecuting attorney for use at or testifying at the criminal trial of
the person as to facts observed or opinions formed.
(5) Failing to treat a person from whom contraband is retrieved or
a blood, urine, or other bodily substance sample is obtained at the
request of a law enforcement officer if the person declines
treatment.
(6) Injury to a person arising from the performance of duties in
good faith under this section. However, immunity does not apply
if the physician, licensed health care professional, hospital, or
agent of a physician or hospital acts with gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(c) For the purposes of a criminal proceeding:
(1) the privileges arising from a patient-physician relationship do
not apply to the contraband, samples, test results, or testimony
described in this section; and
(2) contraband, samples, test results, and testimony may be
admitted in a proceeding in accordance with the applicable rules
of evidence.
(d) The exceptions to the patient-physician relationship specified in
subsection (c) do not affect those relationships in a proceeding that is
not a criminal proceeding.
(e) The contraband, test results, and samples obtained by a law
enforcement officer under subsection (a) may be disclosed only to a
prosecuting attorney or a deputy prosecuting attorney for use as
evidence in a criminal proceeding.
(f) This section does not require a physician or a person under the
direction of a physician to perform a chemical test or to retrieve
contraband.
(g) If the person:
(1) from whom the contraband is to be retrieved or the bodily
substance sample is to be obtained under this section does not
consent; and
(2) resists the retrieval of the contraband or the taking of a
sample;
the law enforcement officer may use reasonable force to assist an
individual, who must be authorized under this section to retrieve
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


contraband or obtain a sample, in the retrieval of the contraband or the
taking of the sample.
(h) The person authorized under this section to retrieve contraband
or obtain a bodily substance sample shall take the sample or retrieve
the contraband in a medically accepted manner.
(i) This subsection does not apply to contraband retrieved or a
bodily substance sample taken at a licensed hospital (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-179(a) and IC 16-18-2-179(b)). A law enforcement officer
may transport the person to a place where the contraband may be
retrieved or the sample may be obtained by any of the following
persons who are trained in retrieving contraband or obtaining bodily
substance samples and who have been engaged to retrieve contraband
or obtain samples under this section:
(1) A physician holding an unlimited license to practice medicine
or osteopathy.
(2) A registered nurse.
(3) A licensed practical nurse.
(4) An advanced emergency medical technician (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-6.5).
(5) A paramedic (as defined in IC 16-18-2-266).
(6) Except as provided in subsections (j) through (k), any other
person qualified through training, experience, or education to
retrieve contraband or obtain a bodily substance sample.
(j) A law enforcement officer may not retrieve contraband or obtain
a bodily substance sample under this section if the contraband is to be
retrieved or the sample is to be obtained from another law enforcement
officer as a result of the other law enforcement officer's involvement in
an accident or alleged crime.
(k) A law enforcement officer who is otherwise qualified to obtain
a bodily substance sample under this section may obtain a bodily
substance sample from a person involved in an accident or alleged
crime who is not a law enforcement officer only if:
(1) the officer obtained a bodily substance sample from an
individual as part of the officer's official duties as a law
enforcement officer; and
(2) the:
(A) person consents to the officer obtaining a bodily substance
sample; or
(B) obtaining of the bodily substance sample is authorized by
a search warrant.
(l) A physician or a person trained in obtaining bodily samples who
is acting under the direction of or under a protocol prepared by a
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


physician shall obtain a blood sample if the following conditions are
satisfied:
(1) A law enforcement officer requests that the sample be
obtained.
(2) The law enforcement officer has certified in writing the
following:
(A) That the officer has probable cause to believe the person
from whom the sample is to be obtained has violated
IC 9-30-5-4, IC 9-30-5-5, IC 35-46-9-6(b)(2),
IC 35-46-9-6(c)(2), or IC 35-46-9-6(c). IC 35-46-9-6(d).
(B) That the offense resulting in a criminal investigation
described in subsection (a) occurred not more than three (3)
hours before the time the sample is requested.
(C) That exigent circumstances exist that create pressing
health, safety, or law enforcement needs that would take
priority over a warrant application.
(3) Not more than the use of reasonable force is necessary to
obtain the sample.
SECTION 11. IC 35-38-9-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) This section applies only
to a person convicted of one (1) or more of the following offenses
if the act constituting the offense is now permitted under
IC 7.1-8-3:
(1) IC 35-48-4-8.3 (possession of paraphernalia).
(2) IC 35-48-4-8.5 (dealing in paraphernalia).
(3) IC 35-48-4-10 (dealing in marijuana).
(4) IC 35-48-4-11 (possession of marijuana).
(b) A person to whom this section applies may petition a court
to expunge all conviction records, including records contained in:
(1) a court's files;
(2) the files of the department of correction;
(3) the files of the bureau of motor vehicles; and
(4) the files of any other person who provided treatment or
services to the petitioning person under a court order;
that relate to the person's conviction, including records of a
collateral action.
(c) A petition for expungement of records must be verified and
filed in a circuit or superior court in the county of conviction. The
petition must set forth:
(1) the date of the conviction;
(2) the county of conviction;
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(3) the court that entered the conviction;
(4) any other known identifying information, such as:
(A) the name of the arresting officer;
(B) the case number or court cause number;
(C) any aliases or other names used by the petitioner;
(D) the petitioner's driver's license number; and
(E) a list of each criminal charge and its disposition, if
applicable;
(5) the date of the petitioner's birth; and
(6) the petitioner's Social Security number.
A person who files a petition under this section is not required to
pay a filing fee.
(d) The court shall serve a copy of the petition on the
prosecuting attorney.
(e) Upon receipt of a petition for expungement, the court:
(1) may summarily deny the petition if the petition does not
meet the requirements of this section, or if the statements
contained in the petition indicate that the petitioner is not
entitled to relief; and
(2) shall grant the petition unless the conditions described in
subsection (a) have not been met.
(f) Whenever the petition of a person under this section is
granted:
(1) no information concerning the conviction (including
information from a collateral action that identifies the
petitioner) may be placed or retained in any state central
repository for criminal history information or in any other
alphabetically arranged criminal history information system
maintained by a local, regional, or statewide law enforcement
agency;
(2) the clerk of the supreme court shall seal or redact any
records in the clerk's possession that relate to the vacated
conviction;
(3) the records of:
(A) the sentencing court;
(B) a court that conducted a collateral action;
(C) a court of appeals; and
(D) the supreme court;
concerning the person shall be redacted or permanently
sealed; and
(4) with respect to the records of a person who is named as an
appellant or an appellee in an opinion or memorandum
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


decision by the supreme court or the court of appeals, or who
is identified in a collateral action, the court shall:
(A) redact the opinion or memorandum decision as it
appears on the computer gateway administered by the
office of technology so that it does not include the
petitioner's name (in the same manner that opinions
involving juveniles are redacted); and
(B) provide a redacted copy of the opinion or
memorandum decision to any publisher or organization to
whom the opinion or memorandum decision is provided
after the date of the order of expungement.
The supreme court and the court of appeals are not required to
redact, destroy, or otherwise dispose of any existing copy of an
opinion or memorandum decision that includes the petitioner's
name.
(g) If the court issues an order granting a petition for
expungement under this section, the order must include the
information described in subsection (f).
(h) If a person whose records are expunged brings an action that
might be defended with the contents of the expunged records, the
defendant is presumed to have a complete defense to the action. In
order for the plaintiff to recover, the plaintiff must show that the
contents of the expunged records would not exonerate the
defendant. The plaintiff may be required to state under oath
whether the plaintiff had records in the criminal or juvenile justice
system and whether those records were expunged. If the plaintiff
denies the existence of the records, the defendant may prove their
existence in any manner compatible with the law of evidence.
SECTION 12. IC 35-46-9-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 244, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in
subsections (b) and (c) and (d), a person who operates a motorboat
while:
(1) having an alcohol concentration equivalent (as defined in
IC 9-13-2-2.4) to at least eight-hundredths (0.08) gram of alcohol
per:
(A) one hundred (100) milliliters of the person's blood; or
(B) two hundred ten (210) liters of the person's breath;
(2) having a controlled substance listed in schedule I or II of
IC 35-48-2 or its metabolite, not including THC, in the person's
body; or
(3) intoxicated;
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


commits a Class C misdemeanor.
(b) A person who:
(1) operates a vehicle with at least five (5) nanograms of THC
per milliliter of the person's whole blood; and
(2) is impaired;
commits a Class C misdemeanor.
(b) (c) The offense under subsection (a) or (b) is a Level 6 felony
if:
(1) the person has a previous conviction under:
(A) IC 14-1-5 (repealed);
(B) IC 14-15-8-8 (repealed); or
(C) this chapter; or
(2) the offense results in serious bodily injury to another person.
(c) (d) The offense under subsection (a) or (b) is a Level 5 felony
if the offense results in the death or catastrophic injury of another
person.
(d) (e) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection (a)(2) that
the accused person consumed the controlled substance in accordance
with a valid prescription or order of a practitioner (as defined in
IC 35-48-1.1-34) who acted in the course of the practitioner's
professional practice.
SECTION 13. IC 35-48-4-8.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.3. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a rolling paper; or
(2) an item marketed to detect the presence of a drug or controlled
substance, including field test kits and test strips; or
(3) a person, including an adult cannabis user, patient,
caregiver, cannabis organization, testing laboratory, research
facility, or transporter described in IC 7.1-8, if the person is
in substantial compliance with the requirements of IC 7.1-8.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally possesses an
instrument, a device, or another object that the person intends to use
for:
(1) introducing into the person's body a controlled substance;
(2) testing the strength, effectiveness, or purity of a controlled
substance; or
(3) enhancing the effect of a controlled substance;
commits a Class C misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Class A
misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated judgment or conviction
under this section.
SECTION 14. IC 35-48-4-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2025,
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) A person who keeps for sale, offers for
sale, delivers, or finances the delivery of a raw material, an instrument,
a device, or other object that is intended to be or that is designed or
marketed to be used primarily for:
(1) ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human
body marijuana, hash oil, hashish, salvia, a synthetic drug, or a
controlled substance;
(2) testing the strength, effectiveness, or purity of marijuana, hash
oil, hashish, salvia, a synthetic drug, or a controlled substance;
(3) enhancing the effect of a controlled substance;
(4) manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing,
processing, or preparing marijuana, hash oil, hashish, salvia, a
synthetic drug, or a controlled substance;
(5) diluting or adulterating marijuana, hash oil, hashish, salvia, a
synthetic drug, or a controlled substance by individuals; or
(6) any purpose announced or described by the seller that is in
violation of this chapter;
commits a Class A infraction for dealing in paraphernalia.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection (a)
commits a Class A misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Level 6
felony if the person has a prior unrelated judgment or conviction under
this section.
(c) This section does not apply to the following:
(1) Items marketed for use in the preparation, compounding,
packaging, labeling, or other use of marijuana, hash oil, hashish,
salvia, a synthetic drug, or a controlled substance as an incident
to lawful research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(2) Items marketed for or historically and customarily used in
connection with the planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,
harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing,
processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging,
storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, or inhaling
of tobacco or any other lawful substance.
(3) A qualified entity (as defined in IC 16-41-7.5-3) that provides
a syringe or needle as part of a program under IC 16-41-7.5.
(4) Any entity or person that provides funding to a qualified entity
(as defined in IC 16-41-7.5-3) to operate a program described in
IC 16-41-7.5.
(5) Items marketed to detect the presence of a drug or controlled
substance, including field test kits and test strips.
(6) A person, including an adult cannabis user, patient,
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


caregiver, cannabis organization, testing laboratory, research
facility, or transporter described in IC 7.1-8, if the person is
in substantial compliance with the requirements of IC 7.1-8.
SECTION 15. IC 35-48-4-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2018,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally:
(A) manufactures;
(B) finances the manufacture of;
(C) delivers; or
(D) finances the delivery of;
marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, pure or adulterated; or
(2) possesses, with intent to:
(A) manufacture;
(B) finance the manufacture of;
(C) deliver; or
(D) finance the delivery of;
marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, pure or adulterated;
commits dealing in marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, a Class A
misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (b) through (d).
(b) A person may be convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(2)
only if:
(1) there is evidence in addition to the weight of the drug that the
person intended to manufacture, finance the manufacture of,
deliver, or finance the delivery of the drug; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least:
(A) ten (10) pounds, if the drug is marijuana; or
(B) three hundred (300) grams, if the drug is hash oil, hashish,
or salvia.
(c) The offense is a Level 6 felony if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense and the
amount of the drug involved is:
(A) less than thirty (30) grams of marijuana; or
(B) less than five (5) grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is:
(A) at least thirty (30) grams but less than ten (10) pounds of
marijuana; or
(B) at least five (5) grams but less than three hundred (300)
grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
(d) The offense is a Level 5 felony if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug dealing offense
and the amount of the drug involved is:
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(A) at least thirty (30) grams but less than ten (10) pounds of
marijuana; or
(B) at least five (5) grams but less than three hundred (300)
grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia;
(2) the:
(A) amount of the drug involved is:
(i) at least ten (10) pounds of marijuana; or
(ii) at least three hundred (300) grams of hash oil, hashish,
or salvia; or
(B) offense involved a sale to a minor; or
(3) the:
(A) person is a retailer;
(B) marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia is packaged in a
manner that appears to be low THC hemp extract; and
(C) person knew or reasonably should have known that the
product was marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
(e) This section does not apply to a person, including an adult
cannabis user, patient, caregiver, cannabis organization, testing
laboratory, research facility, or transporter described in IC 7.1-8,
if the person is in substantial compliance with the requirements of
IC 7.1-8.
SECTION 16. IC 35-48-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2018,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally possesses (pure or adulterated)
marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia;
(2) knowingly or intentionally grows or cultivates marijuana; or
(3) knowing that marijuana is growing on the person's premises,
fails to destroy the marijuana plants;
commits possession of marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, a Class
B misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (b) through (c).
(b) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Class A
misdemeanor if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense; or
(2) the:
(A) marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia is packaged in a
manner that appears to be low THC hemp extract; and
(B) person knew or reasonably should have known that the
product was marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
(c) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense; and
(2) the person possesses:
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151


(A) at least thirty (30) grams of marijuana; or
(B) at least five (5) grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
(d) This section does not apply to a person, including an adult
cannabis user, patient, caregiver, cannabis organization, testing
laboratory, research facility, or transporter described in IC 7.1-8,
if the person is in substantial compliance with the requirements of
IC 7.1-8.
2026 IN 286—LS 6747/DI 151